Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-196
Rules and regulations.

The Nebraska Brand Committee may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Livestock Brand Act and section 54-415.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 27.

Delegation of power to make rules and regulations was essential to complete exercise of powers conferred. Satterfield v. State, 172 Neb. 275, 109 N.W.2d 415 (1961).